Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1215
Low-income home energy assistance program; eligibility; determination; crisis assistance payments.

(1) For purposes of determining eligibility of a household for the low-income home energy assistance program pursuant to section 68-1201 as administered by the State of Nebraska pursuant to the federal Energy Policy Act of 2005, 42 U.S.C. 8621 to 8630, the Department of Health and Human Services shall apply a household total annual income level of one hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level published annually by the United States Department of Health and Human Services or such successor agency which publishes the federal poverty level.

(2) The Department of Health and Human Services shall make crisis assistance payments as necessary of no more than eight hundred dollars per program year and may authorize crisis assistance payments for more than eight hundred dollars per program year based on extenuating circumstances.

Laws 2021, LB306, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB958, § 8.
July 18, 2026